California, session 20252026, AB763.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 1611 of the Fish and Game Code is amended to read:1611.(a)An entity that submits a timber harvesting plan in accordance with Section 4581 of the Public Resources Code or directly to the department is deemed to have given the notification required by Section 1602, as long as the following information is included in the plan:(1)The volume, type, and equipment to be used in removing or displacing any one or combination of soil, sand, gravel, or boulders.(2)The volume of water, intended use, and equipment to be used in any water diversion or impoundment, if applicable.(3)The equipment to be used in road or bridge construction.(4)The type and density of vegetation to be affected and an estimate of the area involved.(5)A diagram or sketch of the location of the operation that clearly indicates the stream or other water and access from a named public road. Locked gates shall be indicated and the compass direction shall be shown.(6)A description of the period of time in which operations will be carried out.(b)Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department is not required to determine whether the notification is complete or otherwise process the notification until the timber harvesting plan and the proper notification fee have both been received by the department.(c)The department shall issue an agreement within five working days of the approval of a timber harvesting plan by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(d)The date on which the term of an agreement issued pursuant to this section begins shall be the date timber operations first commence, unless the agreement specifies a later beginning date.SEC. 2. SECTION 1. Section 13263.8 is added to the Water Code, to read:13263.8. For a regional board that has established general waste discharge requirements for timber harvesting pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13263, notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 13269, the regional board shall, within five working days of receiving a complete request, authorize shall approve, deny, or otherwise act on a request for coverage for a timber harvesting operation performed consistent with an approved timber harvesting plan subject to those established general waste discharge requirements.